test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-aaveed_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - ääʹveed: # Verb 'to open' - full paradigm
     ääʹveed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ääʹvääm
     ääʹveed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ääʹvääk
     ääʹveed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ääʹvad
     ääʹveed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ääʹveep
     ääʹveed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ääʹveʹped
     ääʹveed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ääʹvee 
     ääʹveed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: ääʹveet
     ääʹveed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ääʹveem
     ääʹveed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ääʹviiǩ
     ääʹveed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ääʹvii
     ääʹveed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [ääʹviim, ääʹviin]
     ääʹveed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ääʹviid
     ääʹveed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ääʹvee
     ääʹveed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: ääʹveeš
     ääʹveed+V+Pot+Sg1: ääʹveʹžem
     ääʹveed+V+Pot+Sg2: ääʹveʹžiǩ
     ääʹveed+V+Pot+Sg3: ääʹveež
     ääʹveed+V+Pot+Pl1: [ääʹveʹžep, ääʹveʹžim, ääʹveʹžin]
     ääʹveed+V+Pot+Pl2: ääʹveʹžid 
     ääʹveed+V+Pot+Pl3: ääʹveʹže
     ääʹveed+V+Pot+Sg4: ääʹveʹžet
     ääʹveed+V+Pot+ConNeg: ääʹveʹže
     ääʹveed+V+Cond+Sg1: ääʹveʹčem
     ääʹveed+V+Cond+Sg2: ääʹveʹčiǩ
     ääʹveed+V+Cond+Sg3: ääʹveʹči
     ääʹveed+V+Cond+Pl1: [ääʹveʹčim, ääʹveʹčin, ääʹveʹčep]
     ääʹveed+V+Cond+Pl2: ääʹveʹčid
     ääʹveed+V+Cond+Pl3: ääʹveʹče
     ääʹveed+V+Cond+Sg4: ääʹveʹčeš
     ääʹveed+V+Cond+ConNeg: ääʹveʹče
     ääʹveed+V+Imprt+Sg2: ääʹved
     ääʹveed+V+Imprt+Sg3: ääʹvââǥǥas
     ääʹveed+V+Imprt+Pl1: ääʹvâkap
     ääʹveed+V+Imprt+Pl2: [ääʹveʹǩed, ääʹveed]
     ääʹveed+V+Imprt+Pl3: ääʹvâkaz
     ääʹveed+V+Imprt+ConNeg: ääʹved
     ääʹveed+V+Imprt+ConNegII: ääʹvuku
     ääʹveed+V+Actio+Ess: ääʹveʹmmen
     ääʹveed+V+Actio: [ääʹveeʹm, ääʹveem]
     ääʹveed+V+Act+PrsPrc: ääʹveei
     ääʹveed+V+Act+PrfPrc: [ääʹvääm, ääʹväämma]
     ääʹveed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [ääʹvummu, ääʹvuum]
     ääʹveed+V+VAbess: ääʹveeǩâni
     ääʹveed+V+Ger+Loc: ääʹveeʹst
     ääʹveed+V+Ger+Ess: ääʹveeʹn
     ääʹveed+V+Ger+Instr: ääʹveeʹl
